Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-4508
Representation.

(a) Notice to a person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust instrument or sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 has the same effect as notice given directly to the person represented.

(b) Consent of or waiver by a person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust instrument or sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 is binding on the person represented unless the person represented objects to the representation before the consent or waiver otherwise would become effective.

(c) A person with authority to represent and bind another person under a first-trust instrument or sections 30-3822 to 30-3826 may file an application under section 30-4509 on behalf of the person represented.

(d) A settlor may not represent or bind a beneficiary for purposes of the Uniform Trust Decanting Act.

Laws 2020, LB808, § 18.